Utah statutes.
53-2-108.   Search and Rescue Advisory Board -- Members -- Compensation.

(1)  There is created the Search and Rescue Advisory Board consisting of seven members appointed as follows:

(a)  two representatives designated by the Utah Search and Rescue Association, one of whom is from a county having a population of 75,000 or more; and one from a county having a population of less than 75,000;

(b)  three representatives designated by the Utah Sheriff’s Association, at least one of whom shall be a member of a voluntary search and rescue unit operating in the state, at least one of whom shall be from a county having a population of 75,000 or more, and at least one of whom shall be from a county having a population of less than 75,000;

(c)  one representative of the Division of Homeland Security designated by the director; and

(d)  one private citizen appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.

(2) (a)  The term of each member of the board is four years.

(b)  A member may be reappointed to successive terms.

(c)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(d)  In order to stagger the terms of membership, the members appointed or reappointed to represent the Utah Sheriff's Association on or after May 2, 2005, shall serve a term of two years, and all subsequent terms shall be four years.

(3)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

